Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-303
Coupon bonds; issuance; conditions; limitations.

Whenever satisfactory arrangements are made with the owner or owners, holder or holders, or any of them, of such indebtedness, for the payment of the same, the county board, for and on behalf of any such county, precinct, township or town, or the city council of any such city, or the board of trustees of any such village, or the school board of any such school district, upon petition of two-thirds of the resident freeholder of such county, precinct, township or town, village or school district shall have the authority, and it is hereby required to issue the coupon bonds of such county, precinct, township or town, city, village or school district, and after registration to deliver the same to the owner or owners, holder or holders of such indebtedness, in satisfaction of the same, not exceeding the amount of the original indebtedness; Provided, the amount of bonds issued under sections 10-301 to 10-305 shall not exceed the total amount of bonded indebtedness which any such county, precinct, township or town, city, village or school district may be empowered to issue by law; provided further, sections 10-301 to 10-305 shall not be construed to permit the issuance under any form or authority whatever of a greater bonded indebtedness than is specifically authorized by law; provided further, that said sections shall not be used as a subterfuge or for any purpose for the payment of any claims for which the county, precinct, township or town, city, village or school district is authorized to issue bonds by virtue of any other specific act, nor to satisfy any claim or debt which has been wrongfully or illegally authorized.

Laws 1903, c. 10, § 3, p. 63;

R.S.1913, § 402;

Laws 1921, c. 209, § 1, p. 744;

C.S.1922, § 319;

C.S.1929, § 11-303;

R.S.1943, § 10-303.